Massachusetts, session 194th, S2313.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any special or general law to the contrary, the division of local services,
in partnership with the department of public utilities, shall promulgate and implement a policy
requiring public and investor-owned utility companies intending to dispose of real property to
notify and offer right of first refusal to the municipality in which the real property is located.
of 1